Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 9. Removal from Office

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions as to impeachment generally, see art. 3, §§ 17 to 19 Wyo. Const.

As to mandamus, see §§

1-30-101

to

1-30-118

.

As to quo warranto, see §§

1-31-101

to

1-31-130

.

As to removal of appointive state officers and commissioners by governor, see §

9-1-202

.

As to suspension of state officers pending impeachment, see §

9-1-203

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 309 to 336; 63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Officers and Employees § 441 et seq.

Injunction as remedy against removal of public officer, 34 ALR2d 554.

Retrospective operation of state veterans' tenure statutes with respect to discharge of non-civil service public employee, 58 ALR2d 960.

Public officer's withdrawal of resignation made to be effective at future date, 82 ALR2d 750.

Removal of public officer for misconduct during previous term, 42 ALR3d 691.

Pardon as restoring public office or license or eligibility therefor, 58 ALR3d 1191.

Validity and construction of statute authorizing grand jury to submit report concerning public servant's noncriminal misconduct, 63 ALR3d 586.

20 C.J.S. Counties §§ 97 to 106.

§ 18-3-901.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 41, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1945, ch. 95, §§ 2 to 4; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-118 to 27-120; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-213 to 18-215; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1984, ch. 70, § 1; 1995, ch. 209, § 1, related to causes for removal from office enumerated, procedure as to removal, filling vacancies, and section declared supplemental.

Laws 2011, ch. 41, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

Cross references. —

As to duties of county assessors, see §

18-3-204

.

As to cooperation of county assessor and board of equalization, see §

39-11-102

.1.

General incompetency. —

General incompetency is insufficient to justify removal of county commissioner. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Grounds for removal. —

Misconduct or malfeasance of county commissioner in making unauthorized payment to himself or other commissioners or consenting to such payments to other officials is ground for removal under the provisions of this article, notwithstanding expiration of term of associate commissioners before action was brought. State v. Morgan, 35 Wyo. 92, 247 P. 721,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1926).

County commissioner's acts of misconduct or malfeasance during former term, which were of such nature that they might be discontinued, were not grounds for removal. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Conviction of offense under federal law or law of another state or country, as vacating accused's holding of state or local office or as ground of removal, 20 ALR2d 732.

Assertion of immunity as ground for removing or discharging public officer or employee, 44 ALR2d 789.

§ 18-3-902.
Governor to direct district attorney or attorney general to commence action; petition served with summons; pleading; trial; judgment; change of judge.

Whenever it appears to the governor on the verified complaint of qualified electors or the board of county commissioners of the county that any county officer is guilty of misconduct or malfeasance in office he may direct the attorney general to commence and prosecute an action in the district court of the county in which the officer is an official asking for the removal of the officer. The action shall be commenced by the filing of a verified petition in the name of the state of Wyoming signed by the attorney general setting forth the facts constituting the misconduct or malfeasance in office.

Upon filing of the petition a summons and a copy of the petition shall be served on the defendant as in civil cases. The answer day shall be the same as provided for civil suits. The petition and answer are the only pleadings allowed and the allegations of the answer so far as they conflict with the petition shall be considered denied without a reply.

The action shall be tried in a summary manner by the district court with or without a jury not less than five (5) days nor more than thirty (30) days after answer day. At the trial all questions touching the sufficiency or certainty of the allegations of the petition or answer shall be heard and determined and amendments which are not inconsistent with the original pleadings shall be authorized to be made at once and shall not delay the trial. If the court finds the defendant is guilty of misconduct or malfeasance in office as charged in the petition, a judgment shall be entered removing the defendant from office and taxing against him the costs of the action.

The judge of a district court in which an action for the removal of an officer is pending, if unable to try the action within the period provided by this section, shall call in another district judge.

No change of judge is allowed unless proper application therefor is filed with the answer but if the judge of that district is unable to try the action and has designated another district judge to try the same, the application must be filed within three (3) days after the filing of the order designating the judge to whom the action is referred.

As used in this section, “misconduct or malfeasance” includes, but is not limited to, instances when:

The officer absents himself from his office for an aggregate of sixty (60) days in any three (3) month period unless such absence is caused by illness or other disability;

The officer is absent from his office for more than ninety (90) days because of illness or other disability and the illness or disability will probably not terminate during the unexpired portion of the officer’s term of office.

Whenever a vacancy occurs in any county office under the provisions of this section, it shall be filled as provided by law.

This section is supplemental to all other statutes concerning removal of county officers.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 112, §§ 2 to 5; C.S. 1920, §§ 1399 to 1402; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-202 to 30-205; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-202 to 27-205; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-217 to 18-220; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 2011, ch. 41, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), inserted “or the board of county commissioners,” and deleted “district attorney for the county or the” and “district attorney or the” preceding “attorney general”; and added (f) through (h).

Governor's action. —

Governor may properly direct action for removal of commissioner on examination of report of state examiner. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Governor had jurisdiction to determine whether sheriff should be removed from office on charge of wrongful disposal of liquor. State ex rel. Loomis v. Dahlem, 37 Wyo. 498, 263 P. 708,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1928).

This section does not confine the governor to action upon receipt of a verified complaint and the statute

is fulfilled if the governor has received substantial information in an ordinarily reliable manner. United States v. Field, 190 F. Supp. 216, 1960 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3168 (D. Wyo. 1960), citing State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Substantial, reliable sources. —

The provisions hereof limit source of information to something substantial and ordinarily reliable, in form to be preserved. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Pleadings. —

Petition in action to remove county commissioner need not allege source of governor's information or particular acts of misconduct designated by him. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Allowable pleadings. —

The only pleadings allowed are petition and answer, and allegations in latter are considered denied without reply, so far as its allegations conflict with former, in view of this section. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Objection to pleadings. —

Objection that petition failed to allege source of governor's information should be raised at trial. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Presumption. —

Governor's official direction for bringing action to remove commissioner was to carry presumption, so far as question of initial pleading is concerned, that he has acted in accordance with statute, which may be denied by defendant. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Sufficiency of charges. —

Averments that defendant failed to advertise for bids for roads and bridges and purchase of supplies, and “numerous acts of misconduct and malfeasance in office,” are too general. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Averments that defendant unlawfully paid unitemized accounts for services for which no specified fees were allowed, in violation of official oath and bond, are insufficient; such allegations being conclusions of law. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Charges should be sufficiently explicit to give defendant notice of what he is required to answer. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Sufficiency of judgment. —

Court's remarks that he “ordered the removal of the defendant from office,” and that verdict would carry costs, was insufficient to constitute judgment in action for removal of county commissioner. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Cited

in

State v. Morgan, 34 Wyo. 153, 242 P. 326,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1926); State v. Scott, 34 Wyo. 163, 242 P. 322,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1926).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Amount of attorney's compensation for services in removal proceedings, 57 ALR3d 475, 57 ALR3d 550, 57 ALR3d 584, 58 ALR3d 201, 58 ALR3d 235, 58 ALR3d 317, 59 ALR3d 152.

§ 18-3-903.
Suspension of officers by the governor pending outcome of proceedings; notice; order to be filed; filling of vacancies; restoration of office upon verdict of not guilty; reimbursement of compensation and expense of trial.

Whenever a proceeding as specified by W.S.

18-3-902

has been commenced in the district court, the governor may cause notice to be served upon the accused officer setting forth the misconduct or malfeasance in office as charged in the petition and requiring the officer to appear before him at a designated time and place not less than five (5) days after service of the notice. The governor shall hear the charges against and the defense of the officer, which may be presented by affidavits or otherwise. If the governor determines that the officer is guilty of misconduct or malfeasance in office he may by an order signed by him and filed in the office of the secretary of state, suspend the officer from the further exercise of his duties until the termination of the trial of such officer as provided by W.S.

18-3-902

. Duplicate copies of the order of suspension shall be filed in the offices of the county clerk and the clerk of the district court of the county in which the accused is an officer.

Whenever any county officer is suspended as provided by this section the person or board having authority to fill vacancies in the office shall appoint some qualified elector to temporarily fill the office and perform the duties thereof so long as the suspension continues. If the officer suspended is a county commissioner the governor shall appoint some qualified elector to temporarily fill the office and perform the duties thereof so long as the suspension continues. Whenever any officer is removed by a final judgment entered in such proceeding the vacancy shall be filled as provided by law.

Any county officer who has been suspended under the provisions of this section and who is found by the district court to be not guilty of the misconduct or malfeasance in office charged against him shall be restored to his office and shall receive the compensation provided for the office during the period of his suspension. He shall be reimbursed by the state of Wyoming for all actual and necessary expenditures made by him in connection with all trials and hearings provided for in this section.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 112, §§ 6 to 8; C.S. 1920, §§ 1403 to 1405; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-206 to 30-208; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-206 to 27-208; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-221 to 18-223; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-3-904.
Hearing by the supreme court.

Either party may commence a proceeding in error in the supreme court by filing a petition in error as in civil actions within thirty (30) days after the entry and judgment provided by W.S.

18-3-902

. The supreme court may upon motion of the attorney general fix a time within which the necessary records of the proceedings and the briefs of the parties shall be filed and advance the cause for hearing. No proceeding in error shall suspend or supersede a judgment of the district court removing such officer, but such officer shall be suspended and barred from performing the duties of his office from the time of the entry of such judgment so long as the same remains unreversed.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 112, § 9; C.S. 1920, § 1406; R.S. 1931, § 30-209; C.S. 1945, § 27-209; W.S. 1957, § 18-224; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

For rules of appellate procedure generally, see

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

Editor's notes. —

Proceedings in error were abolished by Rule 72 (d), W.R.C.P. which also provided that the words “proceeding in error” where used in the laws of the state shall be held to mean “appeal.” Rules 72 through 76, W.R.C.P., were superseded, effective August 1, 1978, by the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

In general. —

Cause will be advanced for hearing on merits. State v. Scott, 34 Wyo. 163, 242 P. 322,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1926).

Direct appeal. —

Direct appeal lies to the supreme court in addition to writ of error, as provided in this section. State v. Scott, 34 Wyo. 163, 242 P. 322,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1926).

Failure to fix time. —

Proceedings in error, under this section, will not be dismissed for failure of supreme court, without fault of plaintiff in error, to rule on motion to fix time for filing briefs and records and advance cause for hearing, where all necessary papers and journal entries are before court, and plaintiff in error has filed brief on merits. State v. Morgan, 34 Wyo. 153, 242 P. 326,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1926).

Time to commence proceedings. —

Proceedings in error under this section may be commenced within 30 days after overruling of motion for new trial. State v. Morgan, 34 Wyo. 153, 242 P. 326,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1926).

Insufficiency of pleading considered on appeal. —

Insufficiency of pleading, urged as ground for exclusion of evidence, but not relied on by the court in excluding it, in an action to remove a county commissioner, will not be considered on appeal, since this article provides that such question be considered at trial. State v. Morgan, 35 Wyo. 92, 247 P. 721,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1926).

Cited

in

State v. Morgan, 35 Wyo. 92, 247 P. 721,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1926); State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1926).

§ 18-3-905.
Criminal statutes neither repealed nor barred.

Nothing in W.S.

18-3-902

through

18-3-904

shall be construed as repealing any law making it a crime or misdemeanor for county officers to violate statutes of this state and providing a punishment for the violation. Proceedings under W.S.

18-3-902

through

18-3-904

shall not bar proceedings under any criminal statute.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 112, § 10; C.S. 1920, § 1407; R.S. 1931, § 30-210; C.S. 1945, § 27-210; W.S. 1957, § 18-225; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2011, ch. 41, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “18-3-902” for “18-3-901” twice.

§ 18-3-906.
Prima facie malfeasance in office by sheriffs, district attorneys and county assessors.

Every sheriff and district attorney shall prima facie be guilty of malfeasance in office and subject to removal where open and continuous violations of any law occur in the county for which such officers are employed. Every county assessor is prima facie guilty of malfeasance in office and subject to removal where the county assessor has failed to carry out and follow the legal directives and legal orders of the state board of equalization relative to assessment of property.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 53, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 30-141; C.S. 1945, § 27-211; W.S. 1957, § 18-226; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1984, ch. 70, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to duties of county assessors, see §

18-3-204

.

As to cooperation between county assessor and board of equalization, see §

39-11-102

.1.

Stated

in

Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 18-3-907.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 41, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1899, ch. 7, §§ 1 to 3; R.S. 1899, §§ 1247 to 1249; C.S. 1910, §§ 1159 to 1161; C.S. 1920, §§ 1395 to 1397; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-138 to 30-140; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-212 to 27-214; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-227 to 18-229; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1, related to officers not liable to impeachment, removal by commissioners, grounds, procedure, testimony, filling vacancies, and right of appeal.

Laws 2011, ch. 41, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

Cross references. —

See also §

18-3-901

, as to applicability of this section to removal of officers generally.

For provision that justices of the peace shall not be liable to impeachment, see art. 3, § 18, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision that all officers not liable to impeachment shall be subject to removal for misconduct or malfeasance in office, in such manner as may be provided by law, see art. 3, § 19, Wyo. Const.